Florida, session 2026, HB7025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 11.2421, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
11.2421 Florida Statutes 2026 2025 adopted.—The
accompanying revision, consolidation, and compilation of the
public statutes of 2025 2024 of a general and permanent nature,
excepting tables, rules, indexes, and other related matter
contained therein, prepared by the Office of Legislative
Services under the provisions of s. 11.242, together with
corrections, changes, and amendments to and repeals of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7025 2026
provisions of Florida Statutes 2025 2024 enacted in additional
reviser's bill or bills by the 2026 2025 Legislature, is adopted
and enacted as the official statute law of the state under the
title of "Florida Statutes 2026 2025" and shall take effect
immediately upon publication. Said statutes may be cited as
"Florida Statutes 2026 2025," "Florida Statutes," or "F.S. 2026
2025."
Section 2. Section 11.2422, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
11.2422 Statutes repealed.—Every statute of a general and
permanent nature enacted by the State or by the Territory of
Florida at or prior to the 2025 2024 regular legislative
session, and every part of such statute, not included in Florida
Statutes 2026 2025, as adopted by s. 11.2421, as amended, or
recognized and continued in force by reference therein or in ss.
11.2423 and 11.2424, as amended, is repealed.
Section 3. Section 11.2424, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
11.2424 Laws not repealed.—Laws enacted after the 2025
2024 regular session are not repealed by the adoption and
enactment of the Florida Statutes 2026 2025 by s. 11.2421, as
amended, but shall have full effect as if enacted after its said
adoption and enactment.
Section 4. Section 11.2425, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7025 2026
11.2425 Rights reserved under repealed statutes.—The
repeal of any statute by the adoption and enactment of Florida
Statutes 2026 2025, by s. 11.2421, as amended, shall not affect
any right accrued before such repeal or any civil remedy where a
suit is pending.
Section 5. This act shall take effect on the 60th day
after adjournment sine die of the session of the Legislature in
which enacted.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7025-00